Utah statutes.
10-9a-507.   Conditional uses.
(1)  A land use ordinance may include conditional uses and provisions for
conditional uses that require compliance with standards set forth in an
applicable ordinance.
(2) (a)  A conditional use shall be approved if reasonable conditions are
proposed, or can be imposed, to mitigate the reasonably anticipated
detrimental effects of the proposed use in accordance with applicable
standards.
(b)   If the reasonably anticipated detrimental effects of a proposed
conditional use cannot be substantially mitigated by the proposal or the
imposition of reasonable conditions to achieve compliance with applicable
standards, the conditional use may be denied.
